Colorado statutes. TITLE 36 Natural Resources - General
ARTICLE 1 STATE BOARD OF LAND COMMISSIONERS
36-1-116. Disposition of rentals, royalties, and timber sale proceeds.

Except for proceeds and payments allocated to the state land board trust administration fund pursuant to section 36-1-145 (3) or credited to the public school capital construction assistance fund created in section 22-43.7-104 (1), C.R.S., pursuant to section 22-43.7-104 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S., and except as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a), proceeds received by the state for the sale of timber on public school lands, lease payments and rental payments for said lands, rental payments for the use and occupation of the surface of said lands, and rentals or lease payments for sand, gravel, clay, stone, coal, oil, gas, geothermal resources, gold, silver, or other minerals on said lands shall be credited to the public school income fund for distribution as provided by law.
(1) (a) (I) Except for proceeds and payments allocated to the state land board trust administration fund pursuant to section 36-1-145 (3) or credited to the public school capital construction assistance fund created in section 22-43.7-104 (1), C.R.S., pursuant to section 22-43.7-104 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S., and except as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a), proceeds received by the state for the sale of timber on public school lands, lease payments and rental payments for said lands, rental payments for the use and occupation of the surface of said lands, and rentals or lease payments for sand, gravel, clay, stone, coal, oil, gas, geothermal resources, gold, silver, or other minerals on said lands shall be credited to the public school income fund for distribution as provided by law.

Except as provided in subsections (1)(a)(II)(B) and (1)(a)(II)(C) of this section, for the 2010-11 state fiscal year and each state fiscal year thereafter, the proceeds received by the state for the sale of timber on public school lands, lease payments and rental payments for said lands, rental payments for the use and occupation of the surface of said lands, and rentals or lease payments for sand, gravel, clay, stone, coal, oil, gas, geothermal resources, gold, silver, or other minerals on said lands other than proceeds, rentals, and payments allocated to the state land board trust administration fund pursuant to section 36-1-145 (3) or credited to the public school capital construction assistance fund created in section 22-43.7-104 (1), pursuant to section 22-43.7-104 (2)(b)(I), shall be credited to the permanent school fund and shall become part of the principal of the permanent school fund.

For the 2012-13 state fiscal year, all proceeds received by the state for the sale of timber on public school lands, lease payments and rental payments for said lands, rental payments for the use and occupation of the surface of said lands, and rentals or lease payments for sand, gravel, clay, stone, coal, oil, gas, geothermal resources, gold, silver, or other minerals on said lands other than proceeds, rentals, and payments allocated to the state land board trust administration fund pursuant to section 36-1-145 (3) or credited to the public school capital construction assistance fund created in section 22-43.7-104 (1), C.R.S., pursuant to section 22-43.7-104 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S., shall be transferred to the state public school fund created in section 22-54-114, C.R.S.

For the 2020-21 state fiscal year, all proceeds received by the state for the sale of timber on public school lands, lease payments and rental payments for said lands, rental payments for the use and occupation of the surface of said lands, and rentals or lease payments for sand, gravel, clay, stone, coal, oil, gas, geothermal resources, gold, silver, or other minerals on said lands other than proceeds, rentals, and payments allocated to the state land board trust administration fund pursuant to section 36-1-145 (3) or credited to the public school capital construction assistance fund created in section 22-43.7-104 (1), pursuant to section 22-43.7-104 (2)(b)(I), shall be transferred to the state public school fund created in section 22-54-114.

Except for royalties and other payments allocated to the state land board trust administration fund pursuant to section 36-1-145 (3) or credited to the public school capital construction assistance fund created in section 22-43.7-104 (1), C.R.S., pursuant to section 22-43.7-104 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S., except as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (b), and except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection (1), royalties and other payments for the depletion or extraction of a natural resource on said lands shall be credited to the permanent school fund.

Repealed.

For the 2009-10 state fiscal year, up to three million dollars of royalties and other payments for the depletion or extraction of a natural resource on said lands, other than royalties and other payments allocated to the state land board trust administration fund pursuant to section 36-1-145 (3) or credited to the public school capital construction assistance fund created in section 22-43.7-104 (1), C.R.S., pursuant to section 22-43.7-104 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S., shall be credited to the state board of land commissioners investment and development fund created in section 36-1-153.

For the 2010-11 state fiscal year, up to four million dollars of royalties and other payments for the depletion or extraction of a natural resource on said lands, other than royalties and other payments allocated to the state land board trust administration fund pursuant to section 36-1-145 (3) or credited to the public school capital construction assistance fund created in section 22-43.7-104 (1), C.R.S., pursuant to section 22-43.7-104 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S., shall be credited to the state board of land commissioners investment and development fund created in section 36-1-153.

For the 2011-12 state fiscal year and each state fiscal year thereafter, up to five million dollars of royalties and other payments for the depletion or extraction of a natural resource on said lands, other than royalties and other payments allocated to the state land board trust administration fund pursuant to section 36-1-145 (3) or credited to the public school capital construction assistance fund created in section 22-43.7-104 (1), C.R.S., pursuant to section 22-43.7-104 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S., shall be credited to the state board of land commissioners investment and development fund created in section 36-1-153.

Subject to the limits specified in sub-subparagraphs (B), (C), and (D) of this subparagraph (II), the state board of land commissioners shall determine the exact amount of royalties and other payments for the depletion or extraction of a natural resource on public school lands that is to be credited to the state board of land commissioners investment and development fund pursuant to this subparagraph (II).

For the 2011-12 state fiscal year, the first twenty-one million dollars of royalties and other payments for the depletion or extraction of a natural resource on public school lands in excess of the moneys credited to the state land board trust administration fund pursuant to section 36-1-145 (3), credited to the public school capital construction assistance fund created in section 22-43.7-104 (1), C.R.S., pursuant to section 22-43.7-104 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S., and credited as specified in subparagraph (II) of paragraph (b) of this subsection (1) shall be transferred to the state public school fund created in section 22-54-114, C.R.S. Any amount of royalties and other payments for the depletion or extraction of a natural resource on public school lands in excess of the amounts described in this subparagraph (I) shall be credited to the permanent school fund and shall become part of the principal of the permanent school fund.

For the 2012-13 state fiscal year, the first twenty-seven million dollars of royalties and other payments for the depletion or extraction of a natural resource on public school lands in excess of the moneys credited to the state land board trust administration fund pursuant to section 36-1-145 (3), credited to the public school capital construction assistance fund created in section 22-43.7-104 (1), C.R.S., pursuant to section 22-43.7-104 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S., and credited as specified in subparagraph (II) of paragraph (b) of this subsection (1) shall be transferred to the state public school fund created in section 22-54-114, C.R.S. Any amount of royalties and other payments for the depletion or extraction of a natural resource on public school lands in excess of the amounts described in this subparagraph (II) shall be credited to the permanent school fund and shall become part of the principal of the permanent school fund.

For the 2020-21 state fiscal year, royalties and other payments for the depletion or extraction of a natural resource on public school lands not allocated to the state land board trust administration fund pursuant to section 36-1-145 (3), not credited to the public school capital construction assistance fund created in section 22-43.7-104 (1), pursuant to section 22-43.7-104 (2)(b)(I), and not credited as specified in subsection (1)(b)(II) of this section shall be transferred to the state public school fund created in section 22-54-114.

Proceeds received by the state for the sale of timber on lands belonging to any of the state trust funds other than on public school lands, lease payments and rental payments for said lands, rental payments for the use and occupation of the surface of said lands, and rentals or lease payments for sand, gravel, clay, stone, coal, oil, gas, geothermal resources, gold, silver, or other minerals on said lands shall be credited to the proper trust income fund.

Royalties and other payments for the depletion or extraction of a natural resource on said lands shall be credited to the proper permanent trust fund.

This section is subject to the provisions of section 36-1-145.

Source:

L. 17:

p. 414, § 1.

C.L.

§ 1161.

CSA:

C. 134, § 60.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-16.

L. 71:

p. 1095, § 1.

L. 74:

(1)(a) and (2)(a) amended, p. 314, § 4, effective May 17.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 1869, § 97, effective August 2.

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 536, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 1067, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1)(a)(II) and (1)(b)(I) amended and (1)(c) added, (SB 09-260), ch. 200, pp. 900, 901, §§ 2, 3, effective May 1; (1)(b)(II) amended, (SB 09-022), ch. 246, p. 1109, § 1, effective May 14; (1)(a)(II) amended, (SB 09-257), ch. 424, p. 2368, § 7, effective June 4.

L. 2010:

(1)(a)(II)(B) and (1)(c) amended, (SB 10-150), ch. 108, pp. 362, 363, §§ 2, 3, effective April 15; (1)(a)(II)(A) amended, (HB 10-1369), ch. 246, p. 1101, § 10, effective May 21.

L. 2011:

(1)(a)(II)(B) and (1)(c) amended, (SB 11-230), ch. 305, p. 1468, §§ 9, 10, effective June 9.

L. 2012:

(1)(a)(II)(B) and (1)(c) amended, (SB 12-145), ch. 202, p. 806, § 2, effective May 24.

L. 2013:

(1)(c)(II) amended, (SB 13-112), ch. 69, p. 224, § 2, effective March 22; (1)(a) and (2)(a) amended, (HB 13-1274), ch. 376, p. 2209, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 2020:

(1)(a)(II)(A) amended and (1)(a)(II)(C) and (1)(c)(III) added, (HB 20-1418), ch. 197, p. 959, § 49, effective June 30.

36-1-117. Leases, rentals payable in advance.

All leases of state or school land shall be conditioned upon the payment of rent in advance, and the violation of this condition shall work a forfeiture of the lease, at the option of the state board of land commissioners, after thirty days' notice to the lessees. Notice shall be sent to the last-known post office address of the lessee, as given by the lessee to the director of the state board of land commissioners.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 642, § 9.

C.L.

§ 1162.

CSA:

C. 134, § 61.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-17.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 840, § 13, effective May 21.

36-1-118. Terms of leasing - renewals - sale of leased land.

The public lands of the state may be leased by the state board of land commissioners in such manner and to such persons as will be consistent with article IX of the constitution of the state of Colorado. A lease of lands for grazing or agricultural purposes shall be for a period of ten years unless an alternate term is agreed to by the board and the lessee.

Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (b), in determining the renewal of any expiring lease, the board shall consider, among other things, the care and use given the land and the development work done by the lessee in conserving and promoting the productivity thereof and in promoting benefit for the trusts.

In determining the renewal or termination of an expiring agricultural or grazing lease, or the sale or exchange of land for agricultural or grazing purposes, the board shall consider the benefit that continued agricultural and grazing use of the land contributes to the purposes of the respective trusts by the preservation of the stability of the local community, the revenue provided for trust purposes, and the lessee's stewardship of the land.

Before land is leased to anyone other than the present lessee for agricultural or grazing uses, the present lessee shall be given ten days' notice to begin negotiations and ninety days to complete negotiations with the state board of land commissioners concerning a new lease. The board shall not lease land that is being leased for agricultural or grazing uses to anyone other than the present lessee for agricultural or grazing uses unless the board and lessee fail to agree on lease terms, the present lessee does not wish to renew his or her lease, or the present lessee has failed to comply with any provision of the lease. If the land will not continue to be leased for agricultural or grazing purposes, the board shall find that the benefit of continued agricultural and grazing use of the land is outweighed by the benefit that will be provided by the new use and that continued agricultural or grazing use is incompatible with other purposes for which the land is to be leased.

For agricultural or grazing leases expiring on or after July 1, 1998, the board shall provide the lessee with written notice, one year prior to the expiration of such lease, of its intent not to renew the lease for agricultural or grazing uses.

(1.5) In entering into lease agreements for agricultural use of any land of the state, the state board of land commissioners shall include in such leases terms, incentives, and lease rates that will promote sound stewardship and land management practices, long-term agricultural productivity, and community stability.

Prior to the quarter period beginning April 1, 1955, and prior to each quarter period thereafter, the board shall make a listing of all grazing and other agricultural leases which expire within the second succeeding quarter period thereafter, giving a description of the land leased, the name of the lessee, and the expiration date of the lease. At least five days prior to the beginning of each such quarter period, a copy of such listing shall be certified to and transmitted by the board to the county clerk and recorder of each county in which any such land to be leased is situate and shall, by said county clerk and recorder, immediately upon receipt thereof, be posted in the courthouse in a conspicuous place to which the public has access and kept so posted until all leases listed thereon have expired. A copy of such quarterly listing shall also be posted at the times above provided in the main office of the state board of land commissioners, available for public inspection.

All applications to lease or to renew a lease shall be made in writing to the board, stipulating the rental the applicant is willing to pay, and under such other regulations, not in conflict with the law, as the board may prescribe.

The board shall require from any applicant for a lease that he give evidence of his responsibility to carry out the terms of the lease. Any applicant, except the present lessee, shall deposit with his application a sum of money equal to the first annual rental offered in his application.

The board shall also require that an applicant state under oath the total acreage of agricultural or grazing land, if any, owned and to be operated by him in connection with the land to be leased, and the intended use, during the term of the lease, of both such private land, if any, and public land, either as to agricultural products to be produced thereon or as to the carrying capacity of such lands in terms of the number of livestock such tracts are expected to reasonably support; and, if a renewal, a history, for such period of time as prescribed by the board, of the past use of both such private land, if any, and public land, as to agricultural products produced and the number of livestock grazed thereon.

The board may, in its discretion, offer for sale any land leased at any time during the term of the lease as though said lease had not been executed, or it may withdraw such land from sale during the full term of the lease; except that the board may not sell or exchange land subject to a lease for agricultural or grazing purposes during the term of the lease unless the board complies with the requirements of paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of this section and paragraph (b) of this subsection (4). The board shall subject the sale or exchange of land currently leased for agricultural or grazing purposes to the continuation of the terms of the current lease unless the lessee agrees otherwise, the board or third party buys out the lease at a price equal to the current year's lease rate for each year, or fraction thereof, remaining in the lease, or unless subjecting the sale or exchange of such land to the current lease terms would violate article IX of the constitution of the state of Colorado. In any event, the board may cancel or terminate the lease on land subject to the lease up to a total of eighty acres during the term of the lease without payment as long as such cancellation or termination is done in compliance with paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of this section.

If the board determines that all or a portion of land being leased for agricultural or grazing purposes may be offered for sale or nonsimultaneous exchange, and if the agricultural or grazing lessee is in compliance with the provisions of the lease, and if the lessee is in attendance or represented on the day of sale or at the bid opening for nonsimultaneous exchange of the land, the lessee may exercise his or her rights pursuant to this paragraph (b) to match the highest bid received. The lessee shall have the right to offer matching bids until such time as the high bidder refuses to raise the bid or until the lessee decides not to match the bid, whichever first occurs. If the successful bidder fails to comply with the terms of the sale or nonsimultaneous exchange, the next-highest bidder shall be offered the land without further auction process.

The board may cancel and terminate any lease at any time if it finds that a lessee has violated any of the provisions of the lease or made any false statement in the application therefor.

The board shall as soon as practicable, and not more than thirty days after the close of every quarter period, post, in the main office of the board, a complete listing of leases executed during that quarter period, together with rental figures for the same.

The board may cancel and terminate any lease or other use of state lands procured through fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 643, § 10.

C.L.

§ 1163.

CSA:

C. 134, § 62.

L. 45:

p. 523, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-18.

L. 55:

p. 681, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-18.

L. 76:

(2) amended, p. 749, § 1, effective February 20.

L. 97:

(1.5) added, p. 840, § 14, effective May 21; (1), (4), and (5) amended and (7) added, p. 1151, § 1, effective May 28.

36-1-118.3. Immunity from civil liability.

A lessee of public trust lands and the lessee's agents and employees are immune from civil liability for or on account of damages or injuries to any person resulting from the board's allowing access to the leased trust land by the public for recreational or wildlife purposes without the lessee's approval so long as the damages or injuries are not the result of lessee's or lessee's agents or employees willful or wanton conduct or gross negligence. Assent by the lessee to any plan approved by the board that allows access over which the lessee has no control does not constitute approval by the lessee.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1153, § 2, effective May 28.

36-1-118.5. Financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements for commercial real property - state board of land commissioners financed fund - legislative declaration - definition - repeal.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

The state board of land commissioners lacks a consistent mechanism to make investments in large, economically viable commercial real property holdings;

The state could operate more efficiently if reasonably priced, well-situated lease space were available;

The state board of land commissioners can generate reasonable and consistent revenues for the state school lands by acquiring commercial real property and leasing space to state agencies and other tenants; and

It is the general assembly's intent that annual payments on financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements that the state board of land commissioners instructed the state treasurer to enter into pursuant to this section be made solely from the state board of land commissioners financed fund with transfers first from commercial real property revenues, second from the reserve established in the state board of land commissioners financed fund, and, in the event of any shortfall, from the state board of land commissioners investment and development fund.

Notwithstanding section 24-82-801, the state board of land commissioners may instruct the state treasurer to enter into financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements on behalf of the state school lands for the acquisition, construction, renovation, and improvement of commercial real property that the board will then offer as lease space for state agencies or other tenants only if:

The state board of land commissioners has reviewed the leased space needs for state agencies with the office of the state architect;

The state board of land commissioners has evaluated the project with the assistance of the office of the state architect and the office of state planning and budgeting against the capitol complex master plan if the project is related to capitol complex leased space needs;

The projected annual rent costs of the state agencies that will be located in the property plus any current rental payment or rental payment projected to be received from other nonstate agency tenants for each fiscal year during the maximum term of the proposed financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement will exceed the annual financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation payment for the property;

A financial plan for the financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation transaction that includes the items described in subsection (2)(c) of this section has been approved by the office of state planning and budgeting and reviewed and recommended by the capital development committee of the general assembly pursuant to subsection (3) of this section;

The state board of land commissioners approves the terms of the financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements and any ancillary agreements;

The state board of land commissioners ensures that the agreements for the financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation transaction accurately reflect the financial plan approved by the office of state planning and budgeting and the capital development committee; and

The state controller has approved all agreements pursuant to section 24-30-202, C.R.S.

For purposes of this subsection (2), "annual rent costs" means base rent typically found in the leased space line item in the general appropriation bill plus all operation, maintenance, and related costs paid to a lessor or other third party.

The financial plan must include all necessary parameters of the financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement, including but not limited to leased-space needs, subleasing agreements, income, expenses, capital maintenance costs, interest rates, reserve requirements, amortization, expected return on investment, and overall benefit to the permanent school fund as related to the state board's duties enumerated in section 10 of article IX of the state constitution. The financial plan must also include any other financial consideration that the office of state planning and budgeting or the capital development committee might request after their review of the financial plan. The state board may utilize the services of the state's financial advisors in order to prepare the financial plan.

The state board shall adopt a policy that at minimum specifies that leased space is available to a state agency through the application of this section when such a leased space arrangement is mutually beneficial to the state board and the state agency seeking to lease space.

The state treasurer shall issue the financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements as specified in section 24-36-121.

If the office of state planning and budgeting approves the financial plan, it shall submit the financial plan to the capital development committee of the general assembly. The capital development committee shall review the financial plan and refer its recommendations regarding the financial plan, with written comments, to the state board of land commissioners.

The maximum total amount of annual payments of principal and interest payable by the state during any fiscal year under the terms of all outstanding financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements entered into by the state treasurer as instructed by the state board pursuant to this section may not exceed the lesser of:

The total amount of annual payments of principal and interest required to be paid per fiscal year on all outstanding financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements so long as the principal portions of the outstanding financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements do not exceed fifty million dollars; or

Five million dollars per fiscal year in total annual lease payments of principal and interest required to be paid on all outstanding financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements.

The term of any financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement entered into by the state treasurer as instructed by the state board pursuant to this section may not exceed the shorter of the remaining useful life of the building or twenty-five years.

Annual payments on financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements that the state board of land commissioners instructed the state treasurer to enter into pursuant to this section must be made solely from the state board of land commissioners financed fund with transfers first from the commercial real property operating fund created in section 36-1-153.7, second from the reserve described in subsection (7)(d) of this section, and, in the event of any shortfall, from the state board of land commissioners investment and development fund created in section 36-1-153.

A financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement entered into by the state treasurer on behalf of the state board pursuant to this section shall provide that all payment obligations of the state under the agreement are subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly and that obligations are not deemed or construed as creating an indebtedness of the state within the meaning of any provision of the state constitution or the laws of the state concerning or limiting the creation of indebtedness by the state and do not constitute a multiple fiscal year direct or indirect debt or other financial obligation of the state within the meaning of section 20 (4) of article X of the state constitution.

A financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement entered into by the state treasurer on behalf of the state board pursuant to this section may contain such terms, provisions, and conditions as the state treasurer deems appropriate. The provisions shall allow the board, on behalf of the state school lands, to receive title to the commercial real property that is the subject of the agreement on or prior to the expiration of the entire term of the agreement, including all optional renewal terms. Such financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement may further provide for the issuance, distribution, and sale of instruments evidencing rights to receive rentals and other payments made and to be made under the agreement. Such instruments shall not be notes, bonds, or any other evidence of indebtedness of the state within the meaning of any provision of the state constitution or the laws of the state concerning or limiting the creation of indebtedness by the state. Interest paid under a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement, including interest represented by such instruments, is exempt from Colorado income tax.

A financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement entered into by the state treasurer on behalf of the state board pursuant to this section may require the state to provide insurance; except that no insurance is authorized that would cause the annual financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation payment to exceed the annual rent costs of the state agencies prior to the financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement plus any rent projected to be received from other nonstate agency tenants.

Any provision of the fiscal rules promulgated pursuant to section 24-30-202 (1) and (13) that the state controller deems to be incompatible or inapplicable with respect to a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement entered into by the state treasurer on behalf of the state board pursuant to this section or any ancillary agreement may be waived by the state controller or his or her designee.

If a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement entered into by the state treasurer on behalf of the state board pursuant to this section is executed, during the term of the financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement, money that at the time of the execution is appropriated to a state agency for rental payments shall be transferred to the commercial real property operating fund created in section 36-1-153.7.

The state board of land commissioners financed fund is hereby created in the state treasury. The principal of the fund consists of:

Transfers from the commercial real property operating fund created in section 36-1-153.7 as directed by the state board;

Transfers from the state board of land commissioners investment and development fund created in section 36-1-153 as directed by the state board; and

Other revenues as requested by the state board and approved by the general assembly.

All interest and income earned on the deposit and investment of money in the state board of land commissioners financed fund are credited to the fund and may not be transferred to the general fund or any other fund at the end of any fiscal year. Any uncommitted fund balance at the end of a fiscal year, not including any amount held in reserve as required in subsection (7)(d) of this section, is transferred to the permanent school fund.

Money in the state board of land commissioners financed fund is subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly in the capital section of the annual general appropriation act to make payments required by financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements entered into pursuant to this section.

For each fiscal year commencing on or after July 1, 2014, a reserve consisting of ten percent of the principal of all outstanding financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements entered into pursuant to this section must be maintained. The reserve may only be expended upon a specific appropriation by the general assembly to meet any financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation payments required by financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements entered into pursuant to this section if there are insufficient revenues to cover the payment. The reserve must be replenished within three years of expenditure.

The state controller shall, in cooperation with the state board and the state treasurer, establish accounts in the state board of land commissioners financed fund as necessary to ensure the proper accounting for all financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation transactions.

Net revenue from the disposal of the commercial real property originally acquired through a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement authorized in this section shall be reinvested in land pursuant to section 36-1-124.5.

No later than November 1, 2013, and no later than each November 1 thereafter, the state board shall present a financial report regarding this section to the joint budget committee and to the leadership of the senate and the house of representatives of the general assembly.
(9) (a) (I) No later than November 1, 2013, and no later than each November 1 thereafter, the state board shall present a financial report regarding this section to the joint budget committee and to the leadership of the senate and the house of representatives of the general assembly.

This paragraph (a) is repealed, effective July 1, 2023.

The state auditor shall conduct or cause to be conducted a performance audit of the financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation program authorized by this section. The state auditor shall submit findings, conclusions, and recommendations resulting from the performance audit to the members of the legislative audit committee, the members of the joint budget committee, and the members of the capital development committee, or any successor committees, no later than twelve months after the issuance of the first financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1274), ch. 376, p. 2210, § 3, effective June 5.

L. 2015:

(2)(a)(I) and (2)(a)(II) amended, (SB 15-270), ch. 296, p. 1221, § 22, effective June 5.

L. 2021:

(1)(d), IP(2)(a), (2)(a)(III), (2)(a)(IV), (2)(a)(V), (2)(a)(VI), (2)(c), (2)(e), (4)(a), (4)(b), (4)(c), (5), (6), IP(7)(a), (7)(b), (7)(c), (7)(d), (7)(e), (8), and (9)(b) amended, (HB 21-1316), ch. 325, p. 2057, § 74, effective July 1.

36-1-119. Purchase of improvements.

Should anyone lease, purchase, or receive through an exchange any of the lands belonging to the state upon which there are authorized improvements belonging to the lessee, the new owner or new lessee shall pay the former lessee for such authorized improvements. Before a lease shall issue or before title to the land is conveyed or exchanged, the new owner or new lessee shall file in the office of the state board of land commissioners a receipt showing that the value of the improvements, as agreed upon by the parties or established by the state board, has been paid to the owner thereof in full or shall make satisfactory proof that he or she has tendered to such owner the value of the improvements so agreed upon or established by the board.

Should the state board terminate or cancel a lease of state lands upon which there are authorized improvements belonging to the lessee, the board shall pay the value of the authorized improvements established by the board to the lessee subject to available funding for such purpose and subject to the lessee having satisfied all outstanding obligations to the state in relation to the lease, or unless otherwise agreed to by the lessee, or unless the value of the authorized improvements is paid by a third party.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 643, § 11.

C.L.

§ 1164.

CSA:

C. 134, § 63.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-19.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 222, § 76, effective July 16.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1153, § 3, effective May 28.

36-1-120. Leases - lands in city limits.

Lands within city boundaries may be leased for a term not exceeding fifty years.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 644, § 12.

C.L.

§ 1165.

CSA:

C. 134, § 64.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-20.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 841, § 15, effective May 21.